Utah statutes.
4-24-8.   Fees for recordation, transfer, renewal, and certified copies of brands and marks.

The department, with the approval of the Livestock Brand Board, shall charge and collect fees for the recordation, transfer, and renewal of any brand or mark in each position, and may charge a fee for a certified copy of the recordation.  The fees shall be determined by the department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2).

